Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
Article 7 Precincts and Polling Places
21-2-266.
Polling places and advance voting locations — Use of public buildings; use of portable or movable facilities; unrestricted access to residential communities.

In selecting polling places and advance voting locations, the superintendent of a county or the governing authority of a municipality shall select, wherever practicable and consistent with subsection (d) of Code Section 21-2-265, schoolhouses, municipal buildings or rooms, or other public buildings for that purpose. In selecting polling places and advance voting locations, the superintendent of a county or the governing authority of a municipality shall give consideration to the comfort and convenience those places to be selected will provide to both electors and poll officers. School, county, municipal, or other governmental authorities, upon request of the superintendent of a county or the governing authority of a municipality, shall make arrangements for the use of their property for polling places or advance voting locations; provided, however, that such use shall not substantially interfere with the use of such property for the purposes for which it is primarily intended.

The superintendent of a county or the governing authority of a municipality shall have discretion to procure and provide portable or movable polling facilities of adequate size for any precinct; provided, however, that buses and other readily movable facilities shall only be used in emergencies declared by the Governor pursuant to Code Section 38-3-51 to supplement the capacity of the polling place where the emergency circumstance occurred.

When the boundaries of a restricted access residential community are used as the boundaries for a precinct and a polling place is established within such restricted access residential community for the use of the voters in such precinct, such restricted access community and polling place shall be open to full and complete access by the public when such polling place is in use on the day of a general or special primary or general or special election, including the time while poll officers are setting up the polling place prior to the opening of the polls, the time while the polls are open, and the time while the poll officers are completing the tabulation of the votes, election paperwork, and similar functions after the close of the polls. Such restricted access community and polling place shall also be open to full and complete access by the election superintendent, investigators of the State Election Board, all affected candidates and their representatives, and the public in the event of a recount or recanvass of the votes cast in any primary or election involving such precinct and polling place conducted at such precinct and polling place. In addition, in the event of a contest or challenge to the results of any primary or election involving such precinct and polling place, the election superintendent, upon reasonable notice and at reasonable times, may require such restricted access community and polling place to be open to full and complete access by the election superintendent, investigators of the State Election Board, and all affected candidates and their representatives for the purpose of determining the issues involved in such contest or challenge.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-706, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 812, § 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1512, § 5; Ga. L. 1986, p. 348, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2013, p. 270, § 2/HB 87; Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 20/SB 202.

The 2021 amendment,

effective March 25, 2021, in subsection (a), inserted “and advance voting locations,” near the beginning of the first and second sentences and “or advance voting locations” near the middle of the third sentence, and added the proviso at the end of subsection (b).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 1/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Election Integrity Act of 2021.”’

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 2/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds and declares that:

“(1) Following the 2018 and 2020 elections, there was a significant lack of confidence in Georgia election systems, with many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter suppression and many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter fraud;

“(2) Many Georgia election processes were challenged in court, including the subjective signature-matching requirements, by Georgians on all sides of the political spectrum before and after the 2020 general election;

“(3) The stress of the 2020 elections, with a dramatic increase in absentee-by-mail ballots and pandemic restrictions, demonstrated where there were opportunities to update existing processes to reduce the burden on election officials and boost voter confidence;

“(4) The changes made in this legislation in 2021 are designed to address the lack of elector confidence in the election system on all sides of the political spectrum, to reduce the burden on election officials, and to streamline the process of conducting elections in Georgia by promoting uniformity in voting. Several examples will help explain how these goals are achieved;

“(5) The broad discretion allowed to local officials for advance voting dates and hours led to significant variations across the state in total number of hours of advance voting, depending on the county. More than 100 counties have never offered voting on Sunday and many counties offered only a single day of weekend voting. Requiring two Saturday voting days and two optional Sunday voting days will dramatically increase the total voting hours for voters across the State of Georgia, and all electors in Georgia will have access to multiple opportunities to vote in person on the weekend for the first time;

“(6) Some counties in 2020 received significant infusions of grant funding for election operations, while other counties received no such funds. Promoting uniformity in the distribution of funds to election operations will boost voter confidence and ensure that there is no political advantage conferred by preferring certain counties over others in the distribution of funds;

“(7) Elections in Georgia are administered by counties, but that can lead to problems for voters in counties with dysfunctional election systems. Counties with long-term problems of lines, problems with processing of absentee ballots, and other challenges in administration need accountability, but state officials are limited in what they are able to do to address those problems. Ensuring there is a mechanism to address local election problems will promote voter confidence and meet the goal of uniformity;

“(8) Elections are a public process and public participation is encouraged by all involved, but the enthusiasm of some outside groups in sending multiple absentee ballot applications in 2020, often with incorrectly filled-in voter information, led to significant confusion by electors. Clarifying the rules regarding absentee ballot applications will build elector confidence while not sacrificing the opportunities for electors to participate in the process;

“(9) The lengthy absentee ballot process also led to elector confusion, including electors who were told they had already voted when they arrived to vote in person. Creating a definite period of absentee voting will assist electors in understanding the election process while also ensuring that opportunities to vote are not diminished, especially when many absentee ballots issued in the last few days before the election were not successfully voted or were returned late;

“(10) Opportunities for delivering absentee ballots to a drop box were first created by the State Election Board as a pandemic response. The drop boxes created by rule no longer existed in Georgia law when the emergency rules that created them expired. The General Assembly considered a variety of options and constructed a system that allows the use of drop boxes, while also ensuring the security of the system and providing options in emergency situations;

“(11) The lengthy nine-week runoffs in 2020 were exhausting for candidates, donors, and electors. By adding ranked choice voting for military and overseas voters, the run-off period can be shortened to a more manageable period for all involved, easing the burden on election officials and on electors;

“(12) Counting absentee ballots in 2020 took an incredibly long time in some counties. Creating processes for early processing and scanning of absentee ballots will promote elector confidence by ensuring that results are reported quickly;

“(13) The sanctity of the precinct was also brought into sharp focus in 2020, with many groups approaching electors while they waited in line. Protecting electors from improper interference, political pressure, or intimidation while waiting in line to vote is of paramount importance to protecting the election system and ensuring elector confidence;

“(14) Ballot duplication for provisional ballots and other purposes places a heavy burden on election officials. The number of duplicated ballots has continued to rise dramatically from 2016 through 2020. Reducing the number of duplicated ballots will significantly reduce the burden on election officials and creating bipartisan panels to conduct duplication will promote elector confidence;

“(15) Electors voting out of precinct add to the burden on election officials and lines for other electors because of the length of time it takes to process a provisional ballot in a precinct. Electors should be directed to the correct precinct on election day to ensure that they are able to vote in all elections for which they are eligible;

“(16) In considering the changes in 2021, the General Assembly heard hours of testimony from electors, election officials, and attorneys involved in voting. The General Assembly made significant modifications through the legislative process as it weighed the various interests involved, including adding further weekend voting, changing parameters for out-of-precinct voting, and adding transparency for ballot images; and

“(17) While each of the changes in this legislation in 2021 stands alone and is severable under Code Section 1-1-3, the changes in total reflect the General Assembly’s considered judgment on the changes required to Georgia’s election system to make it ‘easy to vote and hard to cheat,’ applying the lessons learned from conducting an election in the 2020 pandemic.”

Administrative rules and regulations.

Accessibility for elderly and disabled voters, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Registration of Electors, § 183-1-6-.04.

Law reviews.

For article, “SB 202: Revisions to Georgia’s Election and Voting Procedures,” see 38 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 105 (2021).

21-2-267.
Polling places — Equipment; arrangement; storage.

The governing authority of each county and municipality shall provide and the superintendent shall cause all rooms used as polling places to be provided with suitable heat and light and, in precincts in which ballots are used, with a sufficient number of voting compartments or booths with proper supplies in which the electors may conveniently mark their ballots, with a curtain, screen, or door in the upper part of the front of each compartment or booth so that in the marking thereof they may be screened from the observation of others. A curtain, screen, or door shall not be required, however, for the self-contained units used as voting booths in which direct recording electronic (DRE) voting units or electronic ballot markers are located if such booths have been designed so as to ensure the privacy of the elector. When practicable, every polling place shall consist of a single room, every part of which is within the unobstructed view of those present therein and shall be furnished with a guardrail or barrier closing the inner portion of such room, which guardrail or barrier shall be so constructed and placed that only such persons as are inside such rail or barrier can approach within six feet of the ballot box and voting compartments, or booths, or voting machines, as the case may be. The ballot box and voting compartments or booths shall be so arranged in the voting room within the enclosed space as to be in full view of those persons in the room outside the guardrail or barrier. The voting machine or machines shall be placed in the voting rooms within the enclosed space so that, unless its construction shall otherwise require, the ballot labels on the face of the machine can be plainly seen by the poll officers when the machine is not occupied by an elector. In the case of direct recording electronic (DRE) voting units or electronic ballot markers, the devices shall be arranged in such a manner as to ensure the privacy of the elector while voting on such devices, to allow monitoring of the devices by the poll officers while the polls are open, and to permit the public to observe the voting without affecting the privacy of the electors as they vote.

The superintendent, unless otherwise provided by law, may make such arrangements as he or she deems proper for the storage of election equipment in the various precincts of the county or municipality at such times of the year that it will not be used for election purposes and may fix reasonable compensation therefor.

History.

Ga. L. 1922, p. 97, § 1; Code 1933, § 34-1902; Code 1933, § 34-708, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1004, § 14; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1512, § 5; Ga. L. 1983, p. 140, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 999, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 517, § 25; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 31/HB 244; Ga. L. 2019, p. 7, § 15/HB 316.

The 2019 amendment,

effective April 2, 2019, in subsection (a), inserted “or electronic ballot markers” in the middle of the second sentence and near the middle of the last sentence, and substituted “devices” for “units” three times in the last sentence.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Accessibility for elderly and disabled voters, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Registration of Electors, § 183-1-6-.04.

21-2-268.
Compensation for rent, heat, light, and janitorial services.

The superintendent or county or municipal governing authority shall fix the compensation for rent, heat, light, and janitorial services to be paid for the use of polling places for primaries and elections; provided, however, that no compensation for rent, heat, or light shall be paid in the case of schoolhouses, municipal buildings or rooms, or other public buildings used as polling places.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-709, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 32/HB 244.

21-2-269.
Construction of rooms for use as temporary polling places.

If, in any precinct, no proper polling place can be obtained, the superintendent shall cause to be constructed for such precinct a temporary room of adequate size to be used as a polling place.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-707, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1512, § 5; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Accessibility for elderly and disabled voters, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Registration of Electors, Sec. 183-1-6-.04.

21-2-270.
Run-off primaries.

This Code section shall apply to a run-off primary held in a county where:

No run-off election is to be held for election of any candidate who is elected at a nonpartisan election;

A run-off primary is to be held for nomination of one or more candidates who are nominated by one political party for election to the United States House of Representatives or to an office elected by the voters of the entire state; and no run-off primary is to be held for any candidate who is nominated by any other political party or any candidate who is nominated for election other than to the United States House of Representatives or to an office elected other than by the voters of the entire state; and

Fewer than 1 percent of the county’s registered voters voted at the primary of the political party by which a candidate or candidates are to be nominated at the run-off primary.

In any case to which this Code section applies, only one polling place shall be required to be open in the county at the run-off primary; and such polling place shall be the polling place for the precinct wherein the county courthouse is located. Any voter who is otherwise eligible to vote in such run-off primary shall be entitled to vote in said run-off primary at said single polling place. If the superintendent determines that a single polling place is insufficient, all polling places within the county shall be open.

In any case in which only one polling place is to be utilized pursuant to this Code section, the superintendent shall cause an advertisement to be published once a week for two weeks immediately preceding the run-off primary. Such advertisement shall be in substantially the following form:

“At the run-off primary to be held in
_______________
County on

(date)

for the nomination of candidates of the
_______________
Party, only one polling place shall be open and such polling place will be located at
_______________ . Any voter who desires to vote in such run-off primary must vote at said polling place and no other polling places will be open for the run-off primary.”

The superintendent shall also cause a copy of such notice to be prominently posted at each polling place in the county on the date of the run-off primary and on each of the 14 days immediately preceding the date of the run-off primary. The superintendent shall also request the news media to provide news coverage of the fact that all persons desiring to vote at the run-off primary must vote at said single polling place.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-270

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1316, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 269, § 15.

Law reviews.

For note on the 2001 amendment of this Code section, see 18 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 96 (2001).